Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.170

Wage lien forms.

For the purposes of implementing the notice and filing provisions under RCW 60.90.030(2)(a) and 60.90.090 that are applicable to the department of licensing, the department of licensing may, by rule, create wage lien forms specific to the department of licensing, so long as the forms include the information described in those sections.

[ 2021 c 102 s 19.]

NOTES:

Short title—Effective date—2021 c 102: See RCW 60.90.900 and 60.90.902.